Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.623.030

Nonprofit program for certain children and students—Conditions and restrictions.

The board of directors of any school district may establish or allow for the establishment of a nonprofit meal program using school facilities for feeding children who are participating in educational programs or activities conducted by private, nonprofit organizations and entities and students who are attending private elementary and secondary schools, and may authorize the extension of any school food services for the purpose of feeding such children and students, subject to the following conditions and restrictions:

(1) The charge to such persons, organizations, entities or schools for each meal shall be not less than the actual cost of such meal to the school, inclusive of a reasonable charge for overhead and the value of the use of the facilities.

(2) The meal program shall not be operated so as to interfere with the educational process within the school district.

(3) The meal program shall not be operated so as to impair or reduce the provision of food services to students of the school districts.

[ 1979 c 58 s 2. Formerly RCW 28A.58.724.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 c 58: "If any provision of this amendatory act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1979 c 58 s 3.]